California, session 20252026, AB2547.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10110.2 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:10110.2. An insurer shall be entitled to rely upon all statements, declarations, and representations made by an applicant for insurance relative to the insurable interest that the applicant has in the insured, and no an insurer shall not incur any legal liability except as set forth in the policy, by virtue of any untrue statements, declarations, or representations so that are relied upon in good faith by the insurer.